Utah statutes.
72-10-406.   Airport zoning regulations -- Validity, limitations, and restrictions.

(1) (a) All airport zoning regulations adopted under this part shall be reasonable and none shall impose any requirement or restriction which is not reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part.

(b)  In determining what regulations it may adopt, each political subdivision and joint airport zoning board shall consider the character of the flying operations expected to be conducted at the airport, the nature of the terrain within the airport hazard area, the character of the neighborhood, and the uses to which the property to be zoned is put and adaptable.

(2) Any airport zoning regulations adopted under this part may not require the removal, lowering, or other change or alteration of any structure or tree not conforming to the regulations when adopted or amended, or otherwise interfere with the continuance of any nonconforming use, except as provided in Subsection 72-10-407(3).

